Utah statutes.
70A-3-602.   Payment.
(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), an instrument is paid to the extent payment is
made by or on behalf of a party obliged to pay the instrument, and to a person
entitled to enforce the instrument.  To the extent of the payment, the
obligation of the party obliged to pay the instrument is discharged even
though payment is made with knowledge of a claim to the instrument under
Section 70A-3-306 by another person.
(2)  The obligation of a party to pay the instrument is not discharged under
Subsection (1) if:
(a)  a claim to the instrument under Section 70A-3-306 is enforceable against
the party receiving payment, and:
(i)  payment is made with knowledge by the payor that payment is prohibited by
injunction or similar process of a court of competent jurisdiction; or
(ii)  in the case of an instrument other than a cashier's check, teller's
check, or certified check, the party making payment accepted, from the person
having a claim to the instrument, indemnity against loss resulting from
refusal to pay the person entitled to enforce the instrument; or
(b)  the person making payment knows that the instrument is a stolen
instrument and pays a person it knows is in wrongful possession of the
instrument.
